Missouri, session 2026, HB3176.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 442, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto ten new sections, to be
known as sections 442.900, 442.901, 442.902, 442.903, 442.904, 442.905, 442.906, 442.907,
442.908, and 442.909, to read as follows:
442.900. Sections 442.900 to 442.909 shall be known and may be cited as the
"Missouri Declaration and Bylaws Modernization Act".
442.901. Sections 442.900 to 442.909 shall apply to all associations; provided,
however, that sections 442.900 to 442.909 shall apply with respect to events and
circumstances occurring after January 1, 2027, and do not invalidate existing provisions
of the declaration, bylaws, articles of incorporation, or plats of an association.
442.902. As used in sections 442.900 to 442.909, the following terms mean:
(1) "Association", includes:
(a) An association or unit owners' association as defined and provided for in
subdivision (3) of section 448.1-103;
(b) A homeowners' association including, but not limited to, a nonprofit
corporation or unincorporated association of homeowners created pursuant to a
declaration to own and operate portions of a planned community or other residential
subdivision and that has the power under the declaration to assess association members
to pay the costs and expenses incurred in the performance of the association's
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3176 2
obligations under the declaration, or tenants-in-common with respect to the ownership
of common areas or amenities of a planned community or other residential subdivision;
(c) Any cooperative form of ownership of multiunit housing; or
(d) An association as used in the context of condominium owners' association
under sections 448.005 to 448.210;
(2) "Board of directors", the governing body, regardless of title or
denomination, of the association;
(3) "Bylaws", the code or codes of rules other than the articles adopted under
this chapter or chapter 448 for the regulation or management of the affairs of the
association irrespective of the name or names by which such rules are designated.
Bylaws shall not include legally enforceable covenants, declarations, indentures, or
restrictions imposed upon members by validly recorded indentures, declarations,
covenants, restrictions or other recorded instruments, as they apply to real property;
(4) "Declarant", a person who executes a declaration and submits it for
recording in the office of the recorder of the county in which the property described in
the declaration is located;
(5) "Declaration", a recorded written instrument or instruments in the nature of
covenants running with the land that subject the land comprising the community to the
jurisdiction and control of an association or associations in which the owners of the
parcels, or their association representatives, shall be members;
(6) "Person", an individual, corporation, partnership, business enterprise, trust,
estate, or other legal entity.
442.903. The interests or rights, including any financial interests or rights, of a
declarant shall cease upon written release provided by the declarant or a release of all
real property held through either a sale, gift, or any other form of disposition of all
property to the association.
442.904. 1. The declaration and bylaws of an association may be amended as
provided in such instruments; provided, however, that if an amendment to the
declaration or bylaws is proposed by the board of directors and an insufficient number
of votes are obtained to decide the question within ninety days of distributing the
amendment to the members of the association, the instruments shall be adopted if the
association provides a notice to all members containing a statement that the proposed
amendment would be deemed approved by the members unless one-fifth of the voters in
the association submit a vote to reject the proposed amendment within sixty days of the
date of the notice with a copy of the proposed amendment.

HB 3176 3
2. The board of directors is authorized to amend the declaration or bylaws of an
association to correct drafting, grammatical, and cross-reference mistakes, or other
technical errors.
3. No action to challenge the validity of an amendment to the declaration may be
brought more than one year after the amendment to the declaration is recorded and no
action to challenge the validity of an amendment to the bylaws may be brought more
than six months after adoption of the amendment to the bylaws.
4. If an association does not have separate adopted bylaws but such provisions
are contained in a declaration, the amendment process of the declaration shall govern,
and all provisions of the declaration shall remain valid and enforceable.
5. If a declaration or bylaws require consent from a person other than a member
or declarant, a copy of the proposed amendment and a ballot shall be provided to such
person by first-class mail and certified mail to the last known address reasonably
available and accessible to the association. If a member has the address information
available for the person, the association can rely solely upon the information provided
by the member. If the ballot is not returned within the time period and as specified in
the ballot, the person receiving the ballot is deemed to have consented to the proposed
amendment. Only the person who does not respond to the ballot shall have standing to
assert a claim against the validity of an amendment due to a lack of consent.
442.905. 1. All claims of a member adverse to an association shall be deemed
derivative and the provisions of section 355.221 shall apply unless such claim by the
member is considered a tort alleging a breach of duty causing injury or loss to the
association.
2. An association is not required to be represented by an attorney to bring a civil
action in the small claims division of the circuit court in Missouri against a member of
the association for unpaid assessments.
3. An association is not subject to the limitation on the number of small claims
petitions that may be filed or prosecuted in small claims courts under subdivision (2) of
subsection 1 of section 482.330. Any judgment entered against a member of the
association who was personally served with a summons and petition to appear in small
claims court shall be enforceable as a judgment entered by an associate circuit court
under chapter 517, or by a circuit court.
4. No action to challenge an election or appointment of a member to fill a
vacancy on the board of directors shall be brought more than thirty days from the date
of the board member's election or appointment.
5. In the absence of a board of directors, ten percent of the members may call a
special meeting according to the provisions in chapter 355 to conduct an election, and

HB 3176 4
any quorum requirement shall be suspended. The newly elected board of directors shall
be deemed to be the board of directors of the association unless a suit is filed in a court
of competent jurisdiction within sixty days of the election. If a suit is filed, the court
shall appoint a receiver with experience in management of an association during the
pendency of the case.
442.906. 1. Except as expressly provided in sections 442.900 to 442.906, the
effect of these sections shall not be varied by agreements, and rights conferred by
sections 442.900 to 442.906 shall not be waived.
2. If a conflict arises between the provisions relating to an association that is
incorporated under chapter 355 and sections 442.900 to 442.909, the provisions of
sections 442.900 to 442.909 shall control on or after August 28, 2026.
442.907. No association, or any other legal entity under the laws of Missouri,
shall restrict or regulate the transfer of a property interest based upon a protected class
even if such restrictions or regulations are not recorded, or such restrictions or
regulations are unwritten but such practices are engaged in, or such interests are
conveyed as an interest in a legal entity; provided, however, that the foregoing shall
apply only to real property that is or is capable of being occupied. The attorney general
shall have sole authority to commence a civil action in a court of competent jurisdiction
to enforce this section.
442.908. 1. An association, regardless of whether it is unincorporated or its
corporate status has been administratively dissolved, shall have the authority to hire
and terminate a managing agent and other employees, agents, and independent
contractors; provided, however, no contract with a managing agent or employee shall
have a term in excess of three years or automatically renew based upon the occurrence
of an event.
2. An association shall obtain and maintain fidelity insurance covering the
association and any person with access to association funds, including any managing
agent. This requirement may be waived by a majority vote at an annual meeting of the
board of directors.
3. If an association uses the services of a managing agent to collect and disburse
the association's funds:
(1) The managing agent shall obtain and maintain fidelity insurance with the
association named as an additional insured on the policy; and
(2) The records produced, maintained, obtained, and created in performance of
the duties of the managing agent shall be the records of the association and shall be
returned to the association should the relationship between the association and
managing agent terminate within forty days of notice of termination.

HB 3176 5
442.909. 1. In addition to the applicable state law requirements governing
retention of records, an association shall maintain and retain the records as follows:
(1) Membership roster and reports of committees for three years;
(2) Personnel and employee records, including any employment contracts, for
seven years from the last date of employment;
(3) Contracts and certificates of insurance for at least seven years from the last
date of coverage provided under such policies or termination of the contracts;
(4) Budget, income and expense statements, and balance sheets provided to the
members on an as needed, quarterly, or annual basis for seven years from the date such
documents were provided to the members of the association; and
(5) Income tax returns, minutes of the board meetings, and minutes of
membership meetings, shall be retained permanently.
2. The association shall maintain a membership roster of the owners, excluding
telephone numbers and electronic addresses, unless the owner has provided written
consent for the use and disclosure of the owner's telephone numbers and electronic
address.
3. Subject to subsections 4 and 5 of this section, all records retained by an
association shall be available for examination and copying by an owner or the owner's
authorized agent under chapter 355; provided, however, that the association shall not
charge a fee for providing a current membership roster or current and past two years of
budget, income and expense statements, and balance sheets, if the association provides
electronic access of such records to the members.
4. Records retained by an association under this subsection shall not be subject
to inspection, copying, or disclosure, to the extent that the records relate to:
(1) Personnel matters, salary, and medical information concerning identifiable
individuals;
(2) Contracts, leases, and other commercial transactions to purchase or obtain
goods or services currently being negotiated;
(3) Pending or potential litigation or mediation, arbitration, or administrative
proceedings;
(4) Pending or potential matters involving federal, state, or local administrative
or other formal proceedings before a governmental tribunal for enforcement of the
declaration, bylaws, or rules;
(5) Communications with the association's attorneys that are protected by the
attorney-client privilege, or work-product doctrine, or other applicable privilege;

HB 3176 6
(6) Executed ballots, unless the outcome of such election is subject to a timely
challenge by suit or the declaration or bylaws of the association expressly provide such
executed ballots as being subject to inspection; or
(7) Information, the disclosure of which would violate any other provision of law.
5. An association may charge a reasonable fee for providing copies of any
records under this section, including the actual costs associated with staff time and
supervisor's time for assisting with the production of records. An association may also
charge a reasonable fee for staff time associated with supervising an owner's inspection
of records and for the production of such records. If programming time is required
beyond the customary and usual level to comply with a request for records or
information, the fees may include the actual costs of such programming time of the
technical staff.
6. An association is not obligated to compile, format, or synthesize information
that is requested to be provided in electronic or paper format.
7. Information provided under this section shall not be used by the association or
a managing agent for commercial purposes.
✔